Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6128.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Law enforcement officer" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.602. (b) "Open fields doctrine" means the exception to the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution established by the United States Supreme Court in Hester v United States, 265 US 57 (1924) and reaffirmed in Oliver v United States, 466 US 170 (1984). (c) "State agency" means a state department, board, commission, office, agency, institution, or other unit of state government. Sec. 2. The open fields doctrine does not apply to a search by a law enforcement officer or an employee, officer, or agent of a state agency.